Utah statutes.
20A-14-206.   Student petition for student member on local school board.

(1)  A student petition requesting that a local school board appoint a nonvoting student member to the board may be submitted to the board under this section.

(2)  The petition shall have the signatures of at least 500 students regularly enrolled in high school in the district or at least 10% of the number of students regularly enrolled in high school in the district, whichever is less.

(3) (a)  Upon receipt of the petition, the board may appoint a nonvoting student member to serve a one-year term on the local school board as an addition to the number of regular members authorized by law.

(b)  A student member's term begins July 1 and ends on June 30 of the following year.

(4)  A student board member shall be enrolled in a high school in the district and may be less than 18 years old.

(5)  A student member may participate in all board meetings, except executive sessions.

(6) (a)  A student board member shall receive the same expense allowance granted other board members under Section 53A-3-202.

(b)  A student member is not liable for any acts of the governing board.



Enacted by Chapter 1, 1995 General Session

